Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.060

Deputization of assistant to exercise powers and duties of director.

The director of financial institutions shall appoint, deputize, and employ examiners and such other assistants and personnel as may be necessary to carry on the work of the department of financial institutions.

In the event of the director's absence the director shall have the power to deputize one of the assistants of the director to exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed by law with respect to banks, savings banks, foreign bank branches, savings and loan associations, credit unions, consumer loan companies, check cashers and sellers, trust companies and departments, securities, franchises, business opportunities, commodities, escrow agents, and other similar institutions or areas that are performed by the director so long as the director is absent: PROVIDED, That such deputized assistant shall not have the power to approve or disapprove new charters, licenses, branches, and satellite facilities, unless such action has received the prior written approval of the director. Any person so deputized shall possess the same qualifications as those set out in this section for the director.

[ 1995 c 238 s 8; 1993 c 472 s 20; 1977 ex.s. c 185 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.19.020. Prior: 1955 c 285 s 5; prior: (i) 1919 c 209 s 2; 1917 c 80 s 2; RRS s 3209. (ii) 1945 c 123 s 1; 1935 c 176 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10786-11. Formerly RCW 43.19.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 238: See note following RCW 18.44.011.